Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Meetings and Action of the Board

48-18-201. Meetings.

The board of directors may hold regular or special meetings in or out of this state. Unless the bylaws otherwise provide, special meetings of the board of directors may be called by the chair of the board, the president, or any two (2) directors.

Unless the charter or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may permit any or all directors to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which all directors participating may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.20.

48-18-202. Action without meeting.

Except to the extent that the charter or bylaws require that action by the board of directors be taken at a meeting, action required or permitted by chapters 11-27 of this title to be taken by the board of directors may be taken without a meeting if each director signs a consent describing the action to be taken and delivers it to the corporation. If all directors consent to taking such action without a meeting, the affirmative vote of the number of directors that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting is the act of the board. The action must be evidenced by one (1) or more written consents describing the action taken, signed by each director in one (1) or more counterparts, indicating each signing director's vote or abstention on the action, and delivered to the corporation, and shall be included in the minutes or filed with the corporate records reflecting the action taken.

Action taken under this section is the act of the board of directors when one (1) or more consents signed by all the directors are delivered to the corporation. The consent may specify the time at which the action taken thereunder is to be effective. A director's consent may be withdrawn by a revocation signed by the director and delivered to the corporation prior to delivery to the corporation of unrevoked written consents signed by all the directors.

A consent signed under this section has the effect of action taken at a meeting of the board of directors and may be described as such in any document.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.21; 2012, ch. 1051, § 29.

48-18-203. Notice of meeting.

Unless the charter or bylaws provide otherwise, regular meetings of the board of directors may be held without notice of the date, time, place, or purpose of the meeting.

Unless the charter or bylaws provide for a longer or shorter period, special meetings of the board of directors must be preceded by at least two (2) days' notice of the date, time, and place of the meeting. The notice need not describe the purpose of the special meeting unless required by the charter or bylaws.

Notice of an adjourned meeting need not be given if the time and place to which the meeting is adjourned are fixed at the meeting at which the adjournment is taken, and if the period of adjournment does not exceed one (1) month in any one (1) adjournment.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.22.

48-18-204. Waiver of notice.

A director may waive any notice required by chapters 11-27 of this title, the charter, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. Except as provided by subsection (b), the waiver must be in writing, signed by the director entitled to the notice, and filed with the minutes or corporate records.

A director's attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice to the director of the meeting unless the director at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon the director's arrival) objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.23.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-1302.

48-18-205. Quorum and voting.

Unless the charter or bylaws require a greater number, a quorum of a board of directors consists of:

A majority of the fixed number of directors if the corporation has a fixed board size; or

A majority of the number of directors prescribed, or if no number is prescribed, the number in office immediately before the meeting begins, if the corporation has a variable-range size board.

The charter or bylaws may authorize a quorum of a board of directors to consist of no fewer than one third (1/3) of the fixed or prescribed number of directors determined under subsection (a).

If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board of directors unless the charter or bylaws require the vote of a greater number of directors.

A director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors when corporate action is taken is deemed to have assented to the action taken unless:

The director objects at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon the director's arrival) to holding it or transacting business at the meeting;

The director's dissent or abstention from the action taken is entered in the minutes of the meeting; or

The director delivers written notice of the director's dissent or abstention to the presiding officer of the meeting before its adjournment or to the corporation immediately after adjournment of the meeting. The right of dissent or abstention is not available to a director who votes in favor of the action taken.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.24.

Law Reviews.

Why a Board? Group Decisionmaking in Corporate Governance, 55 Vand. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

48-18-206. Committees.

Unless the charter or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may create one (1) or more committees. A committee may consist of one (1) member. All members of committees of the board of directors which exercise powers of the board of directors must be members of the board of directors and serve at the pleasure of the board of directors.

The creation of a committee and appointment of a member or members to it must be approved by the greater of:

A majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken; or

The number of directors required by the charter or bylaws to take action under § 48-18-205.

Sections 48-18-201 — 48-18-205, which govern meetings, action without meetings, notice and waiver of notice, and quorum and voting requirements of the board of directors, apply to committees and their members as well.

To the extent specified by the board of directors or in the charter or bylaws, each committee may exercise the authority of the board of directors under § 48-18-101.

A committee may not, however:

Authorize distributions, except according to a formula or method prescribed by the board of directors;

Fill vacancies on the board of directors or on any of its committees;

Adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws;

Authorize or approve reacquisition of shares, except according to a formula or method prescribed by the board of directors; or

Authorize or approve the issuance or sale or contract for sale of shares, or determine the designation and relative rights, preferences, and limitations of a class or series of shares, except that the board of directors may authorize a committee (or senior executive officer of the corporation) to do so within limits specifically prescribed by the board of directors.

The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of conduct described in § 48-18-301.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.25; 1994, ch. 776, § 31.